Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 155b, chapter 539, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 155b.  The amendments to ORS 401.094  by section 16a [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 539,
Oregon Laws 2021, become operative on July 1, [ 2025] 2026.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 234 (SB 234-A) Page 1